Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1705
Agency, defined.

Agency shall mean each board, commission, bureau, council, department, officer, division, the University of Nebraska, the Nebraska state colleges, or other administrative office or unit of state government.

Laws 1978, LB 715, § 5.